Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB338.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1327.2 heading and (c) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 1327.2. Attendance Policy and Reporting at Charter, Regional Charter and Cyber Charter Schools.--* * *(c) (1) Charter, regional charter and cyber charter schools shall report unexcused absences directly to the department annually through the Pennsylvania Information Management System (PIMS).(2) On a form developed by the department and beginning in the 2024-2025 school year, a cyber charter school shall report, 1234567891011121314151617181920 on a weekly basis, the attendance of each student for the preceding week to the school district of residence.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0338PN0293 - 2 - 123